Utah statutes.
76-6-801.   Acts constituting library theft.

A person is guilty of the crime of library theft when he willfully, for the purpose of converting to personal use, and depriving the owner, conceals on his person or among his belongings library materials while on the premises of the library or willfully and without authority removes library materials from the library building with the intention of converting them to his own use.

